Utah statutes.
62A-3-206.   Investigation of complaints -- Procedures.
(1) (a)  The ombudsman shall investigate each complaint he receives. An
investigation may consist of a referral to another public agency, the
collecting of facts and information over the telephone, or an inspection of
the long-term care facility that is named in the complaint.
(b)  The ombudsman shall notify any complainant of its decision  to not pursue
investigation of a complaint after the initial investigation and the reasons
for the decision.
(2)  In making any investigation, the ombudsman may engage in actions it deems
appropriate including, but not limited to:
(a)  making inquiries and obtaining information;
(b)  holding investigatory hearings;
(c)  entering upon and inspecting any premises, without notice to the
facility, provided the investigator  identifies himself upon entering the
premises as a person authorized by this part to inspect the premises; and
(d)  inspecting or obtaining any book, file, medical record, or other record
required by law to be retained by the long-term care facility or governmental
agency, pertaining to elderly residents, subject to Subsection (3).
(3) (a)  Before reviewing a resident's records, the ombudsman shall seek to
obtain written permission to review the records from the institutionalized
elderly person or his legal representative.
(b)  The effort to obtain permission under Subsection (a) shall include
personal contact with the elderly resident or his legal representative. If the
resident or legal representative refuses to sign a release allowing access to
records, the ombudsman shall record and abide by this decision.  If the
attempt to obtain a signed release fails for any other reason, the ombudsman
may review the records.
(4)  Following any investigation, the ombudsman shall report its findings and
recommendations to the complainant, elderly residents of long-term care
facilities affected by the complaint, and to the long-term care facility or
governmental agency involved.
